Hawaii, session 2026, SB2366.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that section 291-55, Hawaii Revised Statutes, exempts individuals who possess a disabled paid parking exemption permit from paying parking fees via parking meters or unattended pay stations, for the first two and a half hours, or the maximum time the meter allows, whichever is longer. Some permittees have reported that this exemption period is insufficient to cover the time required to park, exit the vehicle, travel to the desired destination, conduct activities at the destination, and return to the parked vehicle. Some permittees have also reported being confused by the statutory language regarding the "maximum time the meter allows". Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to amend the length of the fee exemption period to ensure clarity and consistency across all applicable parking spaces in the State. SECTION 2.  Section 291-55, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b) A driver who is issued a disabled paid parking exemption permit pursuant to section 291-52.2 shall be permitted to park a vehicle in any parking area where payment is required, via a parking meter or unattended pay station, without payment of parking fees for the first [two-and-a-half hours or the maximum amount of time the meter allows, whichever is longer.] four hours and thirty minutes." SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________